Utah statutes.
72-4-210.   K.  Gunn McKay Highway.

(1)  There is established the K. Gunn McKay Highway comprising a section of Route 39 beginning in Ogden at the junction with Harrison Boulevard east to the junction with Huntsville First Street.

(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the K. Gunn McKay Highway on future state highway maps.

